Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-2601.01
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Limited Liability Company Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Certificate of registration or registration certificate from or by the regulating board means either a document prepared and issued by the regulating board or the electronic accessing of the regulating board's licensing records by the Secretary of State;

(2) Professional service means any type of personal service to the public which requires as a condition precedent to the rendering of such service the obtaining of a license or other legal authorization and which includes, but is not limited to, personal services rendered by a certified public accountant, public accountant, dentist, osteopathic physician, physician and surgeon, veterinarian, real estate broker, associate real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or attorney at law. For purposes of the act, those professions pertaining to the diagnosis, care, and treatment of humans shall be considered to be of the same profession; and

(3) Regulating board means a board which is charged with the licensing and regulating of the practice or profession which the limited liability company is organized to render.

Laws 2006, LB 647, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB379, § 22.
January 1, 2013